Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2504
Commission; functions.

The functions of the commission shall be to:

(1) Promote state and federal legislation beneficial to the Indian community in Nebraska;

(2) Coordinate existing programs relating to the Indian community in such areas as housing, education, welfare, medical and dental care, employment, economic development, law and order, and related problems;

(3) Work with other state and federal government agencies and federal and state elected officials in the development of new programs in areas mentioned under subdivision (2) of this section;

(4) Keep the Governor's office apprised of the situation in the Indian community;

(5) Provide the public with information and education relevant to Indian affairs in the State of Nebraska; and

(6) Develop programs to encourage the total involvement of Indian people in activities for the common benefit of the Indian community.

Laws 1971, LB 904, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1217;

Laws 2010, LB1002, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 209.
April 8, 2026